Washington statutes.
RCW 15.145.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Collaborating agencies" means the university, the department, and the commission.

(2) "Commission" means the Washington state conservation commission.

(3) "Department" means the Washington department of agriculture.

(4) "Soil health" means the continued capacity of the soil to function as a vital living ecosystem that sustains plants, animals, and humans.

(5) "Soil health initiative" means the Washington soil health initiative created by this chapter as a collaborative partnership to promote and implement voluntary soil management actions and systems to improve soil health, environmental function, nutrition, and the productivity of working farm and ranch lands.

(6) "University" means Washington State University.

[ 2020 c 314 s 2.]